Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Subchapter 2. State Board of Education

§ 1531.
Responsibility of State Board.

The State Board has overall responsibility for the effectiveness of career technical education. This requires the Board to collect suitable information and to take appropriate steps within its legal, financial, and personnel resources to ensure that:

Career technical education is equally available to students and is of consistent quality in all parts of the State, including areas remote from career technical centers.

The timing and content of career technical education is properly and flexibly coordinated with academic instruction.

Career technical education is available to adult students, particularly in areas where unemployment is high or occupational retraining needs are great. This includes entering into contracts with postsecondary educational institutions or with any resource supplier to provide adult programs at career technical centers.

Career technical education programs and courses of study are demonstrably useful to their graduates in obtaining employment or improving the quality of their employment.

Career technical education programs are well coordinated with related State programs in education and training. This includes ensuring that career technical education graduates receive appropriate credit toward requirements in apprenticeship programs and professional licensing programs.

In order to provide regional career technical education services efficiently, the State Board shall designate a service region for each career technical center. However, the Board may designate a service region for two or more comprehensive high schools if that region is not served by a career technical center.

For a school district that is geographically isolated from a Vermont career technical center, the State Board may approve a career technical center in another state as the career technical center that district students may attend. In this case, the school district shall receive transportation assistance pursuant to section 1563 of this title and tuition assistance pursuant to section 1561(c) of this title. Any student who is a resident in the Windham Southwest Supervisory Union and who is enrolled at public expense in the Charles H. McCann Technical School or the Franklin County Technical School shall be considered to be attending an approved career technical center in another state pursuant to this subsection, and, if the student is from a school district eligible for a small schools support grant pursuant to section 4015 of this title, the student’s full-time equivalency shall be computed according to time attending the school.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 247

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1987, No. 238

(Adj. Sess.), § 14;

1991, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

1993, No. 233

(Adj. Sess.), § 49c, eff. June 21, 1994;

1999, No. 10

, § 1;

1999, No. 29

, § 49, eff. May 19, 1999;

2001, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.), § 188a;

2003, No. 66

, § 183a;

2013, No. 56

, § 28.

§ 1532.
Minimum standards; measurement of standards.

The State Board shall adopt by rule:

Minimum standards for the operation and performance of career technical centers that include the education quality standards adopted by the State Board under subdivision 164(9) and section 165 of this title.

Standards for student performance based on the standards adopted by the State Board under subdivision 164(9) of this title and standards for industry recognized credentials.

The minimum number of days of career technical instruction for each academic year.

The minimum number of hours of instruction for each course of study within career technical education.

The availability of remedial programs offered to students by career technical centers or by another school, agency, or program.

Accounting procedures and standards, including methods for calculating tuition for career technical education.

A system of equipment inventory, amortization, and maintenance.

Procedures and requirements for measurement of student knowledge and skill upon entry into and exit from the career technical program. The purpose of the measurement shall be to determine student achievement in relation to the standards for academic and career technical competence as adopted under subdivision (2) of this subsection. Aggregate results shall be reported to the communities in the service region along with other items reported pursuant to subdivision 165(a)(2) of this title.

The following shall be adopted by procedure or rule:

competencies that graduates of each kind of career technical program should be able to demonstrate, including career technical competencies necessary for the student’s intended employment;

minimum admissions competencies for entrance into each career technical course of study;

procedures by which the Secretary will review and comment on the employment qualifications of candidates for positions at career technical centers for whom State salary assistance will be requested;

requirements for career technical centers to provide programs designed to acquaint prospective students with career technical courses of study;

procedures by which the Secretary will review and approve use of course of study credits in career technical education to meet State graduation requirements;

procedures, including communications with the sending school districts, to identify unique or specific circumstances relative to a student’s progress or safety.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 247

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1987, No. 238

(Adj. Sess.), § 1a;

1991, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.);

1997, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. April 27, 1998;

2015, No. 23

, § 27.

§ 1533.
Career technical center evaluation.

At least once in each period of five years, and in coordination with the Vermont Advisory Council on Career Technical Education, the Secretary shall evaluate the effectiveness of each career technical center in the State. The State Board by rule shall prescribe the method for conducting these evaluations.

Evaluations of career technical centers shall consider at least the following areas:

compliance with this chapter and the rules of the State Board;

the condition and suitability of the facility and its equipment;

the quality of the course of study, including faculty development policies and instruction;

the overall success of the center at combining academic education, skill training, and employability trait development into its program;

the overall success of the center in providing regionwide services and a flexible response to student needs, integrating its courses of study into a coherent program, and coordinating its program with postsecondary career technical education services;

the satisfaction of the center’s customer groups, including graduates, sending schools, and local industry;

the adequacy and effectiveness of the center in meeting the educational and employment needs of all its eligible students, including its success in taking steps to encourage each student to consider enrolling in courses not traditional for that student’s gender.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 247

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1991, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 3, 7;

2003, No. 122

(Adj. Sess.), § 294w;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 142, eff. Feb. 14, 2014;

2015, No. 23

, § 33.

§ 1534.
Course of study evaluation.

At least once in each period of five years, and in coordination with the Vermont Advisory Council on Career Technical Education, the Secretary shall evaluate the effectiveness of each course of study offered by any career technical center in the State. The State Board by rule shall prescribe the method for conducting these evaluations.

Evaluations of courses of study shall consider at least the following areas as they apply in every center offering that course:

the content and quality of the program, including the scope of instruction and the academic and practical competencies required for completion;

the length of the course;

the adequacy of equipment used in the course;

the appropriateness of the program and its content in light of later career and higher education choices made by recent graduates;

the usefulness of the program to recent graduates;

coordination with other State programs, especially licensing, job training, and apprenticeship programs;

possibilities for decentralization of the program.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 247

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1991, No. 204

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2003, No. 122

(Adj. Sess.), § 294w;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 143, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.